Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2 NURSING FACILITIES
25.5-6-203. Nursing facilities - provider fees - federal waiver - fund created - rules - repeal.

Beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2008, and each fiscal year thereafter, the state department shall charge and collect provider fees on health-care items or services provided by nursing facility providers for the purpose of obtaining federal financial participation under the state's medical assistance program as described in articles 4 to 6 of this title. As specified by the priority of the uses of the provider fee in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, the provider fees shall be used to sustain or increase reimbursement for providing medical care under the state's medical assistance program for nursing facility providers.
(1) (a) (I) Beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2008, and each fiscal year thereafter, the state department shall charge and collect provider fees on health-care items or services provided by nursing facility providers for the purpose of obtaining federal financial participation under the state's medical assistance program as described in articles 4 to 6 of this title. As specified by the priority of the uses of the provider fee in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, the provider fees shall be used to sustain or increase reimbursement for providing medical care under the state's medical assistance program for nursing facility providers.

For the fiscal years commencing July 1, 2009, and July 1, 2010, the provider fee shall not exceed seven dollars and fifty cents per nonmedicare-resident day. For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2011, and each fiscal year thereafter, the provider fee shall not exceed twelve dollars per nonmedicare-resident day plus inflation based on the national skilled nursing facility market basket index as determined by the secretary of the department of health and human services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395yy (e)(5) or any successor index.

In calculating the amount of the provider fee portion of the supplemental medicaid payments established under section 25.5-6-202 (5), the state department may include an additional amount of up to five percent of the provider fee portion of said supplemental medicaid payments to initiate the payment to any provider who complies with the established performance measures during the state fiscal year.

The provider fees shall be charged on a nonmedicare-resident day basis and shall be based upon the aggregate gross or net revenue, as prescribed by the state department, of all nursing facility providers subject to the provider fee. The state department may exempt revenue categories from the gross or net revenue calculation and the collection of the provider fee from nursing facility providers, as authorized by federal law.

In accordance with the redistributive method set forth in 42 CFR 433.68 (e)(1) and (e)(2), the state department shall seek a waiver from the broad-based provider fees requirement or the uniform provider fees requirement, or both, to exclude nursing facility providers from the provider fee. The state department shall exempt the following nursing facility providers to obtain federal approval and minimize the financial impact on nursing facility providers:

A facility operated as a continuing care retirement community that provides a continuum of services by one operational entity providing independent living services, assisted living services, and skilled nursing care on a single, contiguous campus. Assisted living services include an assisted living residence as defined in section 25-27-102, C.R.S., or that provides assisted living services on-site, twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week.

A skilled nursing facility owned and operated by the state;

A nursing facility that is a distinct part of a facility that is licensed as a general acute care hospital; and

A facility that has forty-five or fewer licensed beds.

The state department may lower the amount of the provider fee charged to certain nursing facility providers to meet the requirements of 42 CFR 433.68 (e) and to obtain federal approval.

The imposition and collection of a provider fee shall be prohibited without the federal government's approval of a state medicaid plan amendment authorizing federal financial participation for the provider fees. The state department may alter the method prescribed in this section to the extent necessary to meet the federal requirements and to obtain federal approval.

If the provider fee required by this subsection (1) is not approved by the federal government, notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the state department shall not implement the assessment or collection of the provider fee from nursing facility providers.

The state department shall establish a schedule to assess and collect the provider fee on a monthly basis. The state board shall establish rules so that provider fee payments from a nursing facility provider and the state department's supplemental medicaid payments to the nursing facility are due as nearly simultaneously as feasible; except that the state department's supplemental medicaid payments to the nursing facility shall be due no more than fifteen days after the provider fee payment is received from the nursing facility. The state department shall require each nursing facility provider to report annually its total number of days of care provided to nonmedicare residents.

The state department shall not assess or collect the provider fee until state medicaid plan amendments adopting the medicaid reimbursement system for the state's class I nursing facility providers, pursuant to section 25.5-6-202, including the waiver with respect to the provider fees pursuant to this section, have been approved by the federal government.

The state board shall promulgate any rules pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., necessary for the administration and implementation of this section.

A nursing facility provider shall not include any amount of the provider fee as a separate line item in its billing statements.

All provider fees collected pursuant to this section by the state department shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the medicaid nursing facility cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund".

All moneys in the fund shall be subject to federal matching as authorized under federal law and subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purpose of paying the administrative costs of implementing section 25.5-6-202 and this section, to satisfy settlements or judgments resulting from nursing facility provider reimbursement appeals, and to pay the supplemental medicaid payments to offset payment of the provider fee established under section 25.5-6-202 (7).

Following the payment of the amounts described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the moneys remaining in the fund shall be subject to federal matching as authorized under federal law and subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purpose of paying the supplemental medicaid payments for acuity or case-mix of residents established under section 25.5-6-202 (2).

Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (III), after the payment of the amounts described in subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (b), the moneys remaining in the fund shall be subject to federal matching as authorized under federal law and subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purpose of paying the supplemental medicaid payments for higher quality performance established under section 25.5-6-202 (5).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (b), the supplemental medicaid payments established pursuant to section 25.5-6-202 (5) shall not be less than ten percent of the supplemental medicaid payments established under section 25.5-6-202 (7) in the prior state fiscal year.

Following the payment of the amounts described in subsections (2)(b)(I) to (2)(b)(III) of this section, the money remaining in the fund shall be subject to federal matching as authorized under federal law and subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purpose of paying the supplemental medicaid payments established under section 25.5-6-202 (6) for residents who have moderately to very severe mental health conditions, dementia diseases and related disabilities, or acquired brain injury.

Following the payment of the amounts described in subparagraphs (I) to (IV) of this paragraph (b), the moneys remaining in the fund shall be subject to federal matching as authorized under federal law and subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purpose of paying the supplemental medicaid payments for the amount by which the average statewide per diem rate exceeds the general fund share established under section 25.5-6-202 (9)(b)(II).

Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purposes specified in this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund but may be appropriated by the general assembly to pay nursing facility providers in future fiscal years.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (2)(b), for state medicaid expenditures for state fiscal years 2019-20, 2020-21, and any subsequent fiscal years, as long as the increased reimbursements and payments pursuant to the federal "Families First Coronavirus Response Act", Pub.L. 116-127, are still available only, and regardless of when this federal money is made available, money in the fund may be used to offset general fund expenditures in the medicaid program in an equivalent amount that would have been in excess of the fifty percent federal financial participation generated by increased reimbursements and payments appropriated for use in subsections (2)(b)(I) to (2)(b)(V) of this section pursuant to the federal"Families First Coronavirus Response Act", Pub.L. 116-127, or any amendment thereto, or any other federal law that increases federal financial participation above the federal financial participation percentage in effect prior to the increase in federal financial participation provided through the federal"Families First Coronavirus Response Act". The state treasurer shall transfer such amount to the general fund for the state medicaid program.

This subsection (2)(b)(VII) is repealed, effective December 31, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1926, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1781, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a), (1)(g), and (2)(b) amended and (1)(j) added, (SB 09-263), ch. 203, p. 918, § 3, effective May 1; (1)(c)(I) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1975, § 98, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2)(b)(II.7) added, (HB 10-1324), ch. 14, p. 69, § 2, effective March 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(a)(II) and (2) amended, (SB 11-125), ch. 208, p. 900, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(1)(c)(I) and (1)(g) amended, (HB 13-1199), ch. 63, p. 209, § 2, effective March 22.

L. 2014:

(2)(b)(I) amended, (SB 14-143), ch. 191, p. 712, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2018:

(2)(b)(IV) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 644, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(2)(b)(VII) added, (HB 20-1385), ch. 173, p. 797, § 3, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(2)(b)(VII) amended, (SB 21-213), ch. 88, p. 365, § 3, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-503 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 383, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsections (1)(c)(I) and (1)(g), see section 1 of chapter 63, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

25.5-6-204. Providers - reimbursement - intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities - reimbursement - maximum allowable.

For the purpose of making payments to intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities, the state department shall establish a price schedule to be readjusted every twelve months, that shall reimburse, subject to available appropriations, each provider, as nearly as possible, for its actual or reasonable cost of services rendered, whichever is less, its case-mix adjusted direct health-care services costs as defined in section 25.5-6-201 (9), and a fair rental allowance for capital-related assets as defined in section 25.5-6-201 (7). The state board shall adopt rules, including uniform accounting or reporting procedures, in order to determine the actual or reasonable cost of services and case-mix adjusted direct health-care services costs and the reimbursement therefor. The provisions of this paragraph (a) shall not apply to state-operated intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

State-operated intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities shall be reimbursed based on the actual costs of administration, property, including capital-related assets, and room and board, and the actual costs of providing health-care services, and such costs shall be projected by such facilities and submitted to the state department by July 1 of each year for the ensuing twelve-month period. Reimbursement to state-operated intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities shall be adjusted retrospectively at the close of each twelve-month period. The state board shall adopt rules to be effective by June 30, 1988, implementing the provisions of this paragraph (b). In the implementation of such rules, the state department shall ensure, by the establishment of classes of facilities, that the reimbursement to private, nonprofit, or proprietary state-operated intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, is not adversely impacted.

Beginning in fiscal year 2013-14, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the state department is authorized to charge both privately owned intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities and state-operated intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities a service fee for the purposes of maintaining the quality and continuity of services provided by intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities. The service fee charged by the state department pursuant to this paragraph (c) will be assessed pursuant to rules adopted by the state board but must not exceed five percent of the total costs incurred by all intermediate care facilities for the fiscal year in which the service fee is charged. The state board shall adopt rules consistent with federal law in order to implement the provisions of this paragraph (c).

The moneys collected in each fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) shall be transmitted by the state department to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the service fee fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this paragraph (c) as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department to be used toward the state match for the federal financial participation to reimburse intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities pursuant to this section. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

In addition to the actual or reasonable costs and the reimbursement therefor, the state department shall, subject to available appropriations, include an allowance equal to the change in the national bureau of labor statistics consumer price index from the preceding year to compensate for fluctuating costs. This amount shall be determined every twelve months when the statewide average cost is determined by adjusting for inflation. The provider's allowable cost shall be multiplied by the change in the consumer price index measured from the midpoint of the provider's cost report period to the midpoint of the provider's rate period. This allowance is applied to all costs, including case-mix adjusted direct health-care services costs as defined in section

25.5-6-201 (9)

, less interest, up to the reasonable cost established and will be allowed to proprietary, nonprofit, and tax-supported homes; except that the allowance shall not be applied to the costs of state-operated intermediate facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

The state board shall adopt rules to:

Determine and pay to privately owned intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities a reasonable share of the amount by which the reasonable costs of the categories of administration, property, and room and board, excluding food costs, exceed the actual cost in these categories only. The reasonable share shall be defined as twenty-five percent of the amount in the categories for each facility, not to exceed twelve percent of the reasonable cost.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1, 2008.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1, 2008.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1, 2008.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1, 2008.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1, 2008.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1, 2008.)

and (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

(5)(b) amended and (6) added, p. 1615, §§ 4, 3, effective June 2; entire article added with relocations, p. 1927, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(7) added, p. 1802, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) and (2) to (5) amended, p. 1783, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2290, § 3, effective June 5; (1)(b), (1)(c)(I), and (1)(c)(II) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1809, § 46, effective March 1, 2014.

25.5-6-205. Collection of penalties assessed against nursing facilities - creation of cash fund.

The state department shall assess, enforce, and collect any civil penalties that are recommended by the department of public health and environment pursuant to the authority granted under section 25-1-107.5, C.R.S.

Prior to the denial of medicaid payments or the assessment of a civil money penalty against a nursing facility, the nursing facility shall be offered by the state department an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-105, C.R.S. Enforcement and collection of the denial of medicaid payments or civil money penalty shall occur following the decision reached at such hearing.

In conjunction with the authority granted under subsection (1) of this section, the state board shall promulgate rules that:

Provide any nursing facility assessed a civil penalty the opportunity to appeal such assessment;

Govern the procedures for such appeals, including the right of a nursing facility to thirty days' notice prior to the collection of any civil money penalty; and

Are otherwise necessary to implement this section.

Any civil penalties collected by the state department pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the nursing home penalty cash fund, which fund is hereby created.

On and after July 1, 2021, the money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department and the department of public health and environment for the purposes set forth in section 25-1-107.5. Pursuant to section 25-1-107.5 (4)(b)(II)(B), the money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the state department and the department of public health and environment for the purpose of emergency funding needs.

Such moneys shall be used in the manner prescribed in section 25-1-107.5, C.R.S., and the rules promulgated thereunder.

All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1933, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-128), ch. 302, p. 1817, § 2, effective June 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-505 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-206. Personal needs benefits - amount - patient personal needs trust fund required - funeral and final disposition expenses - penalty for illegal retention and use.

The state department, pursuant to its rules, may include in medical care benefits provided under this article 6 and articles 4 and 5 of this title 25.5 reasonable amounts for the personal needs of any recipient receiving nursing facility services or intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities, if the recipient is not otherwise eligible for the amounts from other categories of public assistance, but the amounts for personal needs must not be less than the minimum amount provided for in subsection (2) of this section. Payments for funeral and final disposition expenses upon the death of a recipient may be provided under rules of the state department in the same manner as provided to recipients of public assistance as defined by section 26-2-103 (8).

The basic minimum amount payable pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for personal needs to any recipient admitted to a nursing facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities is seventy-five dollars monthly; except that, commencing January 1, 2015, and each January 1 thereafter, the basic minimum amount shall increase annually by the same percentage applied to the general fund share of the aggregate statewide average of the per diem net of patient payment pursuant to section 25.5-6-202 (9)(b)(I). Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2014, and each fiscal year thereafter, the reduction to patient payments received by nursing facilities resulting from an increase in the basic minimum amount shall be funded in full by general fund and applicable federal funds.

On and after October 1, 1992, the basic minimum amount payable pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for personal needs shall be ninety dollars for the following persons:

A medical assistance recipient who receives a non-service connected disability pension from the United States veterans administration, has no spouse or dependent child, and is admitted to or is residing in a nursing facility; and

A medical assistance recipient who is a surviving spouse of a person who received a non-service connected disability pension from the United States veterans administration, has no dependent child, and is admitted to or is residing in a nursing facility.

All personal needs funds shall be held in trust by the nursing facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, or its designated trustee, separate and apart from any other funds of the facility. The facility shall deposit any personal needs funds of a resident in an amount of fifty or more dollars in an interest-bearing checking account or accounts or savings account or any combination thereof established to protect and separate the personal needs funds of the patients. Any interest earned on a resident's personal needs funds shall be credited to such account or accounts. In the event residents' personal needs funds are maintained in a pooled account, separate accountings shall be made for each resident's share of the pooled account. Any personal needs funds of a resident in an amount less than fifty dollars shall be maintained in a non-interest-bearing account, an interest-bearing account, or a petty cash fund.

At all times, the principal and all income derived from said principal in the patient personal needs trust fund shall remain the property of the participating patients, and the facility or its designated trustee is bound by all of the duties imposed by law upon fiduciaries in the handling of such fund. Those duties include but are not limited to providing notice to a resident when the resident's personal needs account accumulates two hundred dollars less than the federal supplemental security income resource limit for one person.

The facility or its designated trustee shall post a surety bond in an amount to assure the security of all personal needs funds deposited in the patient personal needs trust fund or shall otherwise demonstrate to the satisfaction of the state department that the security of residents' personal needs funds is assured.

Within sixty days after a resident's death, the facility shall transfer the resident's personal needs funds and a final accounting of the funds to the person responsible for settling the resident's estate or, if there is none, to the resident's heirs in accordance with the provisions of title 15, C.R.S. Within fifteen days after receiving the funds, the executor, administrator, or other appropriate representative of the resident's estate shall provide written notice to the state department regarding the receipt of the funds. Upon receipt of the notice, the state department may bring an action to recover the funds pursuant to the provisions of this article and articles 4 and 5 of this title.

The state department shall establish rules concerning the establishment of a patient personal needs trust fund and procedures for the maintenance of a system of accounting for expenditures of each patient's personal needs funds. The facility shall use an accounting system that assures a complete and separate accounting of residents' personal needs funds based on generally accepted accounting principles and that precludes the commingling of a resident's personal needs funds with the facility's funds or the funds of any other person other than the personal needs funds of another resident. These rules shall provide that the nursing facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities shall maintain complete records of all receipts and expenditures involving the patient personal needs trust fund, that all expenditures shall be approved by the patient, legal custodian, guardian, or conservator prior to an expenditure, and that each patient or such patient's legal custodian, guardian, or conservator shall be given at least a quarterly accounting of the receipts and expenditures of such funds. In addition, the rules shall require that the person who maintains the patient personal needs trust fund for the facility and who is responsible for the deposit of moneys into such trust fund shall deposit any personal needs funds received from a patient or from the state department no later than sixty days after the receipt of such moneys.

All patient personal needs trust funds shall be subject to audit by the state department. A record of a patient's personal needs trust fund shall be kept by the facility for a period of three years from the date of the patient's discharge from the facility or until such records have been audited by the state department, whichever occurs later.

Any overpayment of personal needs funds to a nursing facility or an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities by the state department due to the omission, error, fraud, or defalcation of the nursing facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities or any shortage in an audited patient personal needs trust fund shall be recoverable by the state on behalf of the recipient in the same manner and following the same procedures as specified in section 25.5-4-301 (2) for an overpayment to a provider.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a nursing facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities patient from excluding himself or herself from participation in the patient personal needs trust fund.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly fail to deposit personal needs funds received from a patient or from the state department for a patient's personal needs into the patients' personal needs trust fund within sixty days after the receipt of such moneys or to knowingly apply, spend, commit, pledge, or otherwise use a patient personal needs trust fund, or any other moneys paid by a patient or the state department for patient personal needs, for any purpose other than the personal needs of the patient to purchase necessary clothing, incidentals, or other items of personal needs that are not reimbursed by any federal or state program. Deposit or use of personal needs funds, including the use of a petty cash fund for personal needs purposes, is not a violation of this section if such deposit or use is in substantial compliance with applicable rules of the state department. Sums later ordered repaid to the patients' personal needs trust fund as a result of an audit adjustment related to simple accounting errors such as data entry errors, mathematical errors, or posting errors or a dispute related to a proration of patient payment is not a violation of this section.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this subsection (8) by failing to deposit personal needs funds within sixty days after the receipt of such moneys commits the crime of unlawful retention of patient personal needs funds. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this subsection (8) by applying, spending, committing, pledging, or otherwise using a patient personal needs trust fund for any purpose other than the purposes permitted by this subsection (8) commits the crime of unlawful use of a patient personal needs trust fund.

Unlawful retention of patient personal needs funds is:

A petty offense if the amount is less than three hundred dollars;

A class 2 misdemeanor if the amount is three hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand dollars;

A class 1 misdemeanor if the amount is one thousand dollars or more but less than two thousand dollars;

A class 6 felony if the amount is two thousand dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the amount is five thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 4 felony if the amount is twenty thousand dollars or more but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the amount is one hundred thousand dollars or more but less than one million dollars; and

A class 2 felony if the amount is one million dollars or more.

Unlawful use of a patient personal needs trust fund is:

A petty offense if the amount is less than three hundred dollars;

A class 2 misdemeanor if the amount is three hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand dollars;

A class 1 misdemeanor if the amount is one thousand dollars or more but less than two thousand dollars;

A class 6 felony if the amount is two thousand dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the amount is five thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 4 felony if the amount is twenty thousand dollars or more but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the amount is one hundred thousand dollars or more but less than one million dollars; and

A class 2 felony if the amount is one million dollars or more.

Any person who is convicted of violating this subsection (8) may not own or operate a nursing facility that receives medical assistance pursuant to this article or article 4 or 5 of this title. For the purposes of this paragraph (e), "convicted" means the entry of a plea of guilty, including a plea of guilty entered pursuant to a deferred sentence under section 18-1.3-102, C.R.S., the entry of a plea of no contest accepted by the court, or the entry of a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1934, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(8)(a) and (8)(d) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 20, p. 1400, § 20, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

(1), (2)(a), (3)(a), (4), (6), and (7) amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2292, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 14-130), ch. 338, p. 1504, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-006), ch. 123, p. 497, § 25, effective September 7; (8)(c) and (8)(d) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3241, § 483, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-504 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-207. Class I nursing facility reimbursement rates - study - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1614, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1802, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1788, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 26-4-410.1 in Senate Bill 06-131. Section 6 of the bill provided for the renumbering of that section. (See L. 2006, p. 1616.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 383, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

25.5-6-208. Nursing facility provider reimbursement - rules - definition.

Subject to available appropriations and federal matching funds, the executive director shall, by rule, establish a process for providing a wage enhancement supplemental payment to eligible nursing home providers that pay their employees a wage of at least fifteen dollars per hour.

The rules must provide:

That wage enhancement supplemental payments are available to any eligible nursing facility provider;

The form and manner in which an eligible nursing facility provider must attest to the state department that the wage for all employees is fifteen dollars or more per hour;

The timing for the distribution of the wage enhancement supplemental payment; and

The calculation methodology for determining the wage enhancement supplemental payment for each eligible nursing facility provider.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

A wage enhancement supplemental payment made pursuant to this section is in effect as long as the statewide minimum wage is less than fifteen dollars per hour as set forth in section 15 of article XVIII of the state constitution.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

Payments received under this section shall offset costs reported on the med-13 cost report when calculating nursing facility provider per diem reimbursement under 10 CCR 2505.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1210), ch. 320, p. 2976, § 7, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1333), ch. 140, p. 931, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1210, see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-6-209. Establishment of nursing facility provider demonstration of need - criteria - rules.

The state department, in making any medicaid certification determination, shall encourage an appropriate allocation of public health-care resources and the development of alternative or substitute methods of delivering health-care services so that adequate long-term care services are made reasonably available to every qualified recipient within the state at the appropriate level of care, at the lowest reasonable aggregate cost, and in the least restrictive setting. Medicaid certification determinations shall be made in accordance with Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999).

The state department shall develop, analyze, and enforce a demonstration of need to determine the viability of and required need for each new nursing facility provider seeking medicaid certification. The requirement does not apply to a nursing facility provider certified prior to June 30, 2021.

In order to determine a valid demonstration of need, the state department shall, at a minimum, consider:

State demography office data illustrating the present or impending need within the requesting nursing facility's geographic area;

Quality and performance data of the requesting nursing facility or associated nursing facilities;

Business continuity and solvency information of the requesting nursing facility or associated nursing facilities;

Input from the department of public health and environment; the department of local affairs; the department of regulatory agencies; the department of labor and employment; and any local governments, including cities and counties; and

Measurable innovative practices of the requesting nursing facility.

No later than June 30, 2022, the state board shall promulgate rules pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, addressing the establishment of criteria to be used in determining a nursing facility provider's medicaid certification. The state board shall publicly consider and gather input on the demonstration of need criteria prior to promulgating rules. The state department shall consider input from, at a minimum:

Disability advocacy organizations;

Urban nursing facility providers;

Rural nursing facility providers;

Aging and older adult advocacy organizations; and

Nursing facility trade organizations.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1227), ch. 192, p. 1014, § 1, effective September 7.